Louisiana, session 2026, SB438.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:1651(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1651. Greater Lafourche Port Commission; creation; members; election by
divisions; vacancies; qualifications; officers; meetings; per diem;
removal for excessive absences
* * *
F. The commission may fix a per diem not to exceed one two hundred fifty
dollars to be paid to members of the commission for each day the member attends
a meeting of the commission and each day the member spends on business of the
commission authorized by the commission, not to exceed six per diem payments per
month.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.